test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-86putma_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `putma: # Verb (86) `putma 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     putma+V+Inf/mA: putma
     putma+V+Inf: puttuq
     putma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: putnuq
     putma+V+Pss+PrfPrc: putut

     putma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: putu
     putma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: putut
     putma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: putt
     putma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: putumiq
     putma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: pututiq
     putma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: putvaq
     putma+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: putu
     putma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: putõ
     putma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: putõt
     putma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: puttõ
     putma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: putõmiq
     putma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: putõtiq
     putma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: putõq

     putma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pututas

     putma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: putva

     putma+V+Jus: putkuq
